Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3416
Violations; penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 2-3401 to 2-3416 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 16;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 2.
December 31, 2027